Washington statutes.
RCW 19.230.130

Authority to conduct examinations and investigations.

(1) For the purpose of discovering violations of this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter, discovering unsafe and unsound practices, or securing information lawfully required under this chapter, the director may at any time, either personally or by designee, investigate or examine the business and, wherever located, the books, accounts, records, papers, documents, files, and other information used in the business of every licensee or its authorized delegates, and of every person who is engaged in the business of providing money services, whether the person acts or claims to act under or without the authority of this chapter. For these purposes, the director or designated representative shall have free access to the offices and places of business, books, accounts, papers, documents, other information, records, files, safes, and vaults of all such persons. The director or the director's designee may require the attendance of and examine under oath all persons whose testimony may be required about the business or the subject matter of any investigation, examination, or hearing and may require such person to produce books, accounts, papers, documents, records, files, and any other information the director or designated person declares is relevant to the inquiry. The director may require the production of original books, accounts, papers, documents, records, files, and other information; may require that such original books, accounts, papers, documents, records, files, and other information be copied; or may make copies himself or herself or by designee of such original books, accounts, papers, documents, records, files, or other information. The director or designated person may issue a directive, subpoena, or subpoena duces tecum requiring attendance or compelling production of the books, accounts, papers, documents, records, files, or other information.

(2) The licensee, applicant, or person subject to licensing under this chapter shall pay the cost of examinations and investigations as specified in RCW 19.230.320 or rules adopted under this chapter.

(3) Information obtained during an examination or investigation under this chapter may be disclosed only as provided in RCW 19.230.190.

[ 2017 c 30 s 10; 2003 c 287 s 15.]